Maryland, session 2025, SB0949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 15. FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES.
21–1501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM” MEANS THE HARDWARE AND
SOFTWARE THAT ARE COLLECTIVELY CAPABLE OF PERFORMING THE ENTIRE
DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK ON A SUSTAINED BASIS, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER IT IS
LIMITED TO A SPECIFIC OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0949*

SENATE BILL 949
(C) “DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK” MEANS ALL OF THE REAL–TIME
OPERATIONAL FUNCTIONS REQUIRED TO OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY, INCLUDING:
(1) LATERAL VEHICLE MOTION CONTROL THROUGH STEERING;
(2) LONGITUDINAL MOTION CONTROL THROUGH ACCELERATION
AND DECELERATION;
(3) MONITORING THE DRIVING ENVIRONMENT THROUGH OBJECT
AND EVENT DETECTION, RECOGNITION, CLASSIFICATION, AND RESPONSE
PREPARATION;
(4) OBJECT AND EVENT RESPONSE EXECUTION;
(5) MANEUVER PLANNING; AND
(6) SIGNALING WITH LIGHTS OR GESTURES.
(D) (1) “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE” MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE
EQUIPPED WITH AN AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM DESIGNED TO FUNCTION
WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER.
(2) “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE” INCLUDES A LEVEL 4 OR 5
SYSTEM AS DEFINED BY “TAXONOMY AND DEFINITIONS FOR TERMS RELATED TO
DRIVING AUTOMATION SYSTEMS FOR ON–ROAD MOTOR VEHICLES” PUBLISHED BY
THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS INTERNATIONAL.
(E) “MINIMAL RISK CONDITION” MEANS A LOW–RISK CONDITION A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ACHIEVES, BY WAY OF THE HUMAN DRIVER OR THE
AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM, WHEN THE VEHICLE CANNOT SAFELY CONTINUE THE
TRIP.
(F) “OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN” MEANS OPERATING CONDITIONS
UNDER WHICH A GIVEN AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS SPECIFICALLY DESIGNED
TO FUNCTION, INCLUDING ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS, ROADWAY
CHARACTERISTICS, OR TIME–OF–DAY RESTRICTIONS.
21–1502.
(A) A PERSON MAY OPERATE A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY IN THE STATE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER AND WITH THE AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED IF THE VEHICLE MEETS THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:

SENATE BILL 949 3
(1) IF A FAILURE OF THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM OCCURS
THAT RENDERS THE SYSTEM UNABLE TO PERFORM THE ENTIRE DYNAMIC DRIVING
TASK RELEVANT TO ITS INTENDED OPERATIONAL DESIGN DOMAIN, THE FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WILL ACHIEVE A MINIMAL RISK CONDITION;
(2) THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS CAPABLE OF OPERATING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW, UNLESS AN EXEMPTION HAS
BEEN GRANTED BY THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(3) THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE BEARS THE REQUIRED
MANUFACTURER’S CERTIFICATION LABEL INDICATING THAT THE VEHICLE IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY
STANDARDS, INCLUDING REFERENCE TO ANY EXEMPTION GRANTED BY THE
NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION.
(B) (1) BEFORE OPERATING A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ON A
HIGHWAY IN THE STATE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER AND WITH THE AUTOMATED
DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED, A PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A LAW ENFORCEMENT
INTERACTION PLAN TO THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) A LAW ENFORCEMENT INTERACTION PLAN SHALL CONTAIN
INFORMATION ON:
(I) HOW TO COMMUNICATE WITH A FLEET SUPPORT
SPECIALIST WHO IS AVAILABLE DURING THE TIMES THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE IS IN OPERATION;
(II) HOW TO SAFELY REMOVE THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE FROM THE HIGHWAY AND STEPS TO PROPERLY TOW THE VEHICLE;
(III) HOW TO RECOGNIZE WHETHER THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE IS OPERATING AUTONOMOUSLY; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE MANUFACTURER,
OWNER, OR ADMINISTRATION CONSIDERS NECESSARY, INCLUDING INFORMATION
REGARDING HAZARDOUS CONDITIONS OR PUBLIC SAFETY RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE OPERATION OF A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE.
(C) BEFORE OPERATING A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE ON A HIGHWAY IN
THE STATE WITHOUT A HUMAN DRIVER AND WITH THE AUTOMATED DRIVING
SYSTEM ENGAGED, THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE SHALL SUBMIT PROOF OF
REQUIRED SECURITY TO THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE FORM THE

SENATE BILL 949
ADMINISTRATION PROVIDES.
(D) WHEN A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IS OPERATING WITH THE
AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED, THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS
CONSIDERED TO:
(1) BE THE VEHICLE OPERATOR FOR DETERMINING COMPLIANCE
WITH THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW;
(2) SATISFY ELECTRONICALLY ALL PHYSICAL ACTS REQUIRED BY A
VEHICLE DRIVER; AND
(3) BE LICENSED TO OPERATE THE VEHICLE.
(E) (1) A HUMAN DRIVER MAY OPERATE A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE
IF THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS NOT ENGAGED.
(2) A PERSON SHALL OPERATE A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE IF
THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM MAKES A REQUEST FOR THE PERSON TO
INTERVENE WHEN THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM IS NOT CAPABLE OF
PERFORMING THE ENTIRE DYNAMIC DRIVING TASK WITHIN THE OPERATIONAL
DESIGN DOMAIN.
(F) (1) IN THE EVENT OF A VEHICLE CRASH INVOLVING A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE, THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE AND THE OPERATOR OR
PASSENGER IN THE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE SHALL COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 20 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) ALL NOTICE AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 20
OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL BE SATISFIED WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER A VEHICLE CRASH
INVOLVING A FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE, UNLESS AN EXTENSION IS GRANTED
UNDER TITLE 20 OF THIS ARTICLE.
21–1503.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY, FOR–HIRE VEHICLE COMPANY, OR OTHER GROUND
PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION COMPANY MAY USE FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES.
(B) ANY PROVISION OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW THAT BY ITS NATURE
APPLIES ONLY TO A HUMAN DRIVER DOES NOT APPLY TO THE OPERATOR OF A FULLY
AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE WITH THE AUTOMATED DRIVING SYSTEM ENGAGED BEING
USED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY, FOR–HIRE VEHICLE COMPANY,

SENATE BILL 949 5
OR OTHER GROUND PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION COMPANY.
21–1504.
THE MOTOR VEHICLE TITLE AND REGISTRATION FOR A FULLY AUTONOMOUS
VEHICLE SHALL IDENTIFY THE VEHICLE AS A “FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE”.
21–1505.
A STATE AGENCY OR LOCAL POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT PROHIBIT THE
OPERATION OF FULLY AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES ON HIGHWAYS UNDER THEIR
JURISDICTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.